District of Columbia statutes.
44-638

Sunset.

This chapter shall expire on September 30, 2014.

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 5019, 57 DCR 6242

History

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5019 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).

Emergency Legislation